Arkansas, session 2025, HB1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-47-202, concerning definitions relating
to commitment and treatment for persons with mental illness, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(22) “Behavioral health impairment” means a substantial
impairment of emotional processes, the ability to exercise conscious control
of one's actions, or the ability to perceive reality or to reason, when the
impairment is manifested by instances of extremely abnormal behavior or
extremely faulty perceptions that interfere with one (1) or more activities
of daily living.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-47-207(c)(1), concerning the admission
criteria into a healthcare facility for an involuntary commitment, is amended
to read as follows:
(c) Involuntary Admission Criteria.
*JMB048*
02-20-2025 11:57:35 JMB048

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/6/25 H2/20/25 HB1169
(1) A person shall be eligible for involuntary admission if he
or she is in such a mental condition as a result of mental:
(A) A mental illness, disease, or disorder that he or she
poses a clear and present danger to himself or herself or others; or
(B) A medical condition that causes a behavioral health
impairment, including without limitation dementia, encephalitis,
or delirium, that he or she poses a clear and present danger to
himself or herself or others.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-47-207(c)(2)(D)(ii), concerning the
definition of "a clear and present danger to himself or herself" relating to
the admission criteria into a healthcare facility for an involuntary
commitment, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) The person needs mental health treatment on a
continuing basis to prevent a relapse or harmful deterioration of his or her
condition mental condition as a result of subdivision (c)(1)(A) or (c)(1)(B)
of this section; and

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-47-210(c), concerning immediate
confinement by a healthcare facility for seventy-two (72) hours, is amended
to read as follows:
(c) If the person is transported to a hospital or to a receiving
facility or program or to the office of a licensed physician of the State of
Arkansas or of the United States Government, either salaried or self-
employed, for purposes of initial evaluation and treatment, then the hospital
or receiving facility or program or physician may detain the person for
initial evaluation and treatment provided:
(1) The person is immediately advised of his or her rights as
provided in § 20-47-211 and informed that he or she maintains all fundamental
rights under § 20-47-220;
(2) The person is determined by the treatment staff of the
hospital or receiving facility or program or by the physician to be of danger
to himself or herself or others as defined in § 20-47-207 or has a medical
condition that causes a behavioral health impairment, including without
limitation mental disability, dementia, or other permanent or temporary
behavioral health impairment, that he or she poses a clear and present danger
02-20-2025 11:57:35 JMB048

As Engrossed: H1/30/25 H2/6/25 H2/20/25 HB1169
under to himself or herself or others as defined under § 20-47-207(c)(2);
(3) The person is provided a telephone number for the hospital
or receiving facility or program's department of patient relations, risk
management, or other similar department;
(4) The person is seen and evaluated by a physician or advanced
practice registered nurse every twenty-four (24) hours to confirm whether the
immediate confinement remains warranted;
(5) The limitations on treatment for a person under this section
shall be same as the limitations on treatment under § 20-47-218;
(6) The authority of the sheriff of the county or law
enforcement of the city of the first class where the hospital or receiving
facility or program is located or the security officer of the hospital or
receiving facility or program shall be the same as the authority under § 20-
47-219(a); and
(3)(7) A hearing pursuant to § 20-47-209(a)(1) is held within
the specified time period.

/s/L. Johnson


















02-20-2025 11:57:35 JMB048